Arkansas, session 2025, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ADDITIONAL STATE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH HOSPITAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services - Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, the following:
(A) for expenses associated with the construction of an additional
State Behavioral Health Hospital, in a sum not to exceed .......$250,000,000.

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, the Chief Fiscal
*LCW001*
01-15-2025 10:22:41 LCW001

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1034
Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the
State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State the sum of two hundred fifty
million dollars ($250,000,000) from the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund to a cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE - CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code § 5-2-
314(j)(1) and (2), concerning the hearing and examination of a defendant
regarding mental disease or defect, are amended to read as follows:
(j)(1)(A) It is the duty of the prosecuting attorney's office in the
county where the petition is filed to represent the State of Arkansas at any
hearing held pursuant to this section except a hearing pending at the
Arkansas State Hospital in Pulaski County.
(B) A prosecuting attorney may contract with another
attorney to provide services under subdivision (j)(1)(A) of this section.
(2) The office of the Prosecutor Coordinator shall appear for
and on behalf of the State of Arkansas at the Arkansas State Hospital in
Little Rock.

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE - CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code § 20-47-
208(a)(1), concerning the role of a prosecuting attorney in a petition for
involuntary commitment and treatment of a person, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney's office in
the county where the petition is filed to represent the petitioner,
regardless of the petitioner's financial status, at all hearings held in the
circuit court pursuant to this subchapter except those hearings held before
the circuit judge at the Arkansas State Hospital in Pulaski County, Arkansas.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE - CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code § 25-10-
401 is amended to read as follows:
25-10-401. Creation.
The state institutions known as the Arkansas State Hospital at Little
Rock, the Arkansas Health Center at Benton, the Arkansas Services Center at
01-15-2025 10:22:41 LCW001

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1034
Jonesboro, the youth services center located at North Little Rock, the
Arkansas Juvenile Assessment and Treatment Center located in Saline County,
and all other facilities owned and operated by the Department of Human
Services for youth services or mental health treatment are consolidated to
form the Department of Human Services State Institutional System.

SECTION 6. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
01-15-2025 10:22:41 LCW001

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 HB1034
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1,2025 is essential to the operation of the
agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the
event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective
date of this Act beyond July 1,2025 could work irreparable harm upon the
proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs.
Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and
safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1,2025.

/s/A. Collins
























01-15-2025 10:22:41 LCW001